Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1344
Unlawful acts; depriving or obtaining property or services; penalties.

(1) Any person who intentionally accesses or causes to be accessed, directly or indirectly, any computer, computer system, computer software, or computer network without authorization or who, having accessed any computer, computer system, computer software, or computer network with authorization, knowingly and intentionally exceeds the limits of such authorization shall be guilty of an offense if he or she intentionally: (a) Deprives another of property or services; or (b) obtains property or services of another.

(2) The offense constitutes a Class III felony when the value of the property or services involved is five thousand dollars or more.

(3) The offense constitutes a Class IV felony when the value of the property or services involved is one thousand five hundred dollars or more, but less than five thousand dollars.

(4) The offense constitutes a Class I misdemeanor when the value of the property or services involved is five hundred dollars or more, but less than one thousand five hundred dollars.

(5) The offense constitutes a Class II misdemeanor when the value of the property or services involved is less than five hundred dollars.

Laws 1985, LB 371, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 135, § 6;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 56.